Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There are appropriated to the Judicial Department, for  the biennium begin-
ning July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the  following amounts, for the following purposes:
(1) Judicial compensation............... $126,209,444
(2) Operations................................. $593,009,737
(3) Mandated payments .................. $ 29,077,612
(4) State court technology
systems ..................................... $ 17,906,459
(5) Debt service .............................. $ 51,607,494
(6) Third-party debt
collection................................... $ 18,106,042
(7) State Court Facilities and
Security Account ...................... $ 4,225,884
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and in-
cluding reimbursements from  federal service agreements, but excluding lottery funds and
federal funds not described in this section, collected  or received by the Judicial Department
for the following purposes:
(1) Operations................................. $ 18,864,753
(2) Mandated payments .................. $ 797,955
(3) State Court Facilities and
Security Account ...................... $ 6,755,282
(4) State Court Technology Fund ... $ 13,370,595
(5) Oregon Courthouse Capital
Construction and Improvement
Fund.......................................... $119,940,466
SECTION 3.
Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$5,408,623 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses from federal funds other than those described  in section 2 of this 2025
Act collected or received by the Judicial Department.
Enrolled House Bill 5012 (HB 5012-A) Page 1
SECTION 4. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Judicial Department, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the  General
Fund, the amount of $389,786 for payment of expenses of the Oregon Law Commission.
SECTION 5. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appropri-
ated to the Judicial Department, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the  General
Fund, the amount of $61,242 for payment of expenses of the Council on Court Procedures.
SECTION 6. (1) In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appro-
priated to the Judicial Department,  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the Gen-
eral Fund, the amount of $8,735,212  for the purpose of providing conciliation and mediation
services in circuit courts.
(2) The  Chief Justice of the Supreme Court shall distribute the moneys appropriated un-
der this section to the counties  of this state to fund conciliation and mediation services in
circuit courts. The Chief Justice shall consult with  the presiding judges of the circuit courts
before making the distributions.
SECTION 7. (1) In  addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Judicial Department, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025,  out of the Gen-
eral Fund, the amount of $8,735,211 for  the purpose of operating law libraries or providing
law library services.
(2) The Chief Justice of the Supreme Court shall distribute the moneys appropriated  un-
der this section to  the counties of this state based on revenues received from filing fees
collected during the biennium ending June 30, 2025, in civil actions commenced in the circuit
court for the county.
SECTION 8. (1) In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appro-
priated to the Judicial Department,  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the Gen-
eral Fund, the amount of $14,902,860 for  the purpose of funding the Legal Services Program
described in ORS 9.572.
(2) The Chief Justice of the Supreme Court shall distribute all moneys appropriated under
this section to the Oregon State Bar in eight quarterly installments of equal amount.
SECTION 9. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses by the Judicial Department from American Rescue  Plan Act Coronavirus State
Fiscal Recovery Fund moneys received  by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services
and transferred to  the Judicial Department, for external pass-through payments, for the
following purposes:
(1) Harney County Courthouse
annex renovation ...................... $ 3,000,000
(2) Umatilla County Courthouse
replacement planning................ $ 100,000
(3) Hood River Courthouse
replacement planning................ $ 42,549
SECTION 10. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (3), chapter 380, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and including reimbursements from federal
service agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section
2, chapter 380, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or received by the  Judicial Department, for the
State Court Facilities and Security Account, is decreased by $792,500, for a budget realign-
ment.
SECTION 11.
In addition to and  not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Judicial Department, for the biennium ending  June 30, 2025, out of the General
Fund, the amount of $792,500, for state and county court facilities security and emergency
preparedness.
Enrolled House Bill 5012 (HB 5012-A) Page 2
SECTION 12. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (4), chapter 380, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and including reimbursements from federal
service agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section
2, chapter 380, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or received by the  Judicial Department, for the
State Court Technology Fund, is decreased by $2,927,500, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 13.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Judicial Department by  section 1 (4), chapter 380, Oregon Laws 2023, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2025, for state court technology systems, is increased  by $2,927,500.
SECTION 14. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House June 18, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 23, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5012 (HB 5012-A) Page 3